Illinois, session 104th, SB297.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 24-1, 24-1.2-5, 24-2, and 36-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)7    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 8    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 9weapons when he knowingly:10        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 11    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 12    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 13    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 14    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 15    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 16    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 17    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 18    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 19    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or20        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 21    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 22    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 23    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or   SB0297- 2 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or2        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 3    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 4    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 5    used for religious worship; or 6        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 7    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 8    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 9    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 10    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 11    18 years of age or older; or12        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 13    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 14    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 15    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 16    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 17    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 18    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 19    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 20    conditions:21            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or22            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or23            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 24        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 25        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 26        Owner's Identification Card; or  SB0297- 3 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 2        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 3        been issued a currently valid license under the 4        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 5        (5) Sets a spring gun; or6        (6) (Blank) Possesses any device or attachment of any 7    kind designed, used or intended for use in silencing the 8    report of any firearm; or9        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 10    carries:11            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 12        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 13        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 14        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 15        without manually reloading by a single function of the 16        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 17        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 18        or carries any combination of parts designed or 19        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 20        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 21        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 22        possession or under the control of a person;23            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 24        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 25        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 26        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by   SB0297- 4 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 2        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 3        26 inches; or4            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 5        other container containing an explosive substance of 6        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 7        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 8        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or9        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 10    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 11    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 12    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 13    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 14    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 15    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 16    unloaded firearms is conducted.17        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 18    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 19    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 20    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or21        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 22    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 23    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 24    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 25    identity; or26        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her   SB0297- 5 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 2    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 3    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 4    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 5    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 6    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 7    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 8    another person as an invitee with that person's 9    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 10    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 11    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 12    one of the following conditions:13            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or14            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or15            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 16        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 17        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 18        Owner's Identification Card; or19            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 20        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 21        been issued a currently valid license under the 22        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 23        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 24    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 25    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 26    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon   SB0297- 6 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 2    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 3    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 4    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 5    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 6    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 7    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 8    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or9        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 10    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 11    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 12    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 13    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 14    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 15    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 16    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 17    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 18    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 19    the propellant contained in such tube between the 20    projectile and the cap; or21        (12) (Blank); or22        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 23    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 24    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 25    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 26    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club"   SB0297- 7 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 2    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 3    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or4        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 5    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 6    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 7    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 8    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 9    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 10    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 11    or12        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 13    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or14        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 15    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 16    violation of Section 24-1.9. 17    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 18subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 19subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 20commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 21violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 22Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 23subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 2424-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 25violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a Class 2 felony 26and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less   SB0297- 8 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the weapon is 2possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle as 3defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or on 4the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which case it shall 5be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a second or 6subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(8), 724-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits a Class 3 8felony. A person convicted of a violation of subsection 924-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 felony. The 10possession of each weapon or device in violation of this 11Section constitutes a single and separate violation.12    (c) Violations in specific places.13        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 14    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 15    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 16    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 17    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 18    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 19    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 20    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 21    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 22    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 23    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 24    comprising any public park, on the real property 25    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 26    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from   SB0297- 9 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 2    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 3    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 4    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 5    public transportation facility, or residential property 6    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 7    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 8    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 9    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 10    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.11        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 12    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 13    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 14    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 15    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 16    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 17    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 18    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 19    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 20    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 21    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 22    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 23    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 24    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 25    students to or from school or a school related activity, 26    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public   SB0297- 10 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 2    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 3    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 4    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 5    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 6    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 7    commits a Class 3 felony.8        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 9    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 10    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 11    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 12    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 13    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 14    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 15    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 16    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 17    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 18    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 19    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 20    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 21    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 22    students to or from school or a school related activity, 23    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 24    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 25    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 26    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or   SB0297- 11 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 2    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 3    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 4    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 5    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 6    of this State for the conduct of official business.7        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 8    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 9    security officers of such school, college, or university 10    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 11    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 12    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school 13    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 14    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 15    package.16        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 17    means any public or private elementary or secondary 18    school, community college, college, or university.19        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 20    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 21    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 22    persons by means available to the general public, except 23    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 24    of the general public as passengers; and "public 25    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 26    where one may obtain public transportation.   SB0297- 12 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 2omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 3subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 4possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 5such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 6substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 7(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 8upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 9such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 10operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 11and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 12shall not apply to the driver.13    (e) Exemptions.14        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 15    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 16    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 17    this Section.18        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 19    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 20    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 21    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 22    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 23    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 24    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 25    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 26    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an   SB0297- 13 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 2    switchblade knives. 3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 4103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 5    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.2-5)6    Sec. 24-1.2-5. Aggravated discharge of a machine gun or a 7firearm equipped with a device designed or used for silencing 8the report of a firearm. 9    (a) A person commits aggravated discharge of a machine gun 10or a firearm equipped with a device designed or used for 11silencing the report of a firearm when he or she knowingly or 12intentionally: 13        (1) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 14    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 15    a firearm at or into a building he or she knows to be 16    occupied and the machine gun or the firearm equipped with 17    a device designed or used for silencing the report of a 18    firearm is discharged from a place or position outside 19    that building; 20        (2) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 21    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 22    a firearm in the direction of another person or in the 23    direction of a vehicle he or she knows to be occupied; 24        (3) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 25    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of   SB0297- 14 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    a firearm in the direction of a person he or she knows to 2    be a peace officer, a person summoned or directed by a 3    peace officer, a correctional institution employee, or a 4    fireman while the officer, employee or fireman is engaged 5    in the execution of any of his or her official duties, or 6    to prevent the officer, employee or fireman from 7    performing his or her official duties, or in retaliation 8    for the officer, employee or fireman performing his or her 9    official duties; 10        (4) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 11    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 12    a firearm in the direction of a vehicle he or she knows to 13    be occupied by a peace officer, a person summoned or 14    directed by a peace officer, a correctional institution 15    employee or a fireman while the officer, employee or 16    fireman is engaged in the execution of any of his or her 17    official duties, or to prevent the officer, employee or 18    fireman from performing his or her official duties, or in 19    retaliation for the officer, employee or fireman 20    performing his or her official duties; 21        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 22    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 23    a firearm in the direction of a person he or she knows to 24    be emergency medical services personnel while the 25    emergency medical services personnel is engaged in the 26    execution of any of his or her official duties, or to   SB0297- 15 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    prevent the emergency medical services personnel from 2    performing his or her official duties, or in retaliation 3    for the emergency medical services personnel performing 4    his or her official duties; 5        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 6    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 7    a firearm in the direction of a vehicle he or she knows to 8    be occupied by emergency medical services personnel, while 9    the emergency medical services personnel is engaged in the 10    execution of any of his or her official duties, or to 11    prevent the emergency medical services personnel from 12    performing his or her official duties, or in retaliation 13    for the emergency medical services personnel performing 14    his or her official duties; 15        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 16    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 17    a firearm in the direction of a person he or she knows to 18    be an emergency management worker while the emergency 19    management worker is engaged in the execution of any of 20    his or her official duties, or to prevent the emergency 21    management worker from performing his or her official 22    duties, or in retaliation for the emergency management 23    worker performing his or her official duties; or24        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 25    with a device designed or used for silencing the report of 26    a firearm in the direction of a vehicle he or she knows to   SB0297- 16 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    be occupied by an emergency management worker while the 2    emergency management worker is engaged in the execution of 3    any of his or her official duties, or to prevent the 4    emergency management worker from performing his or her 5    official duties, or in retaliation for the emergency 6    management worker performing his or her official duties. 7    (b) A violation of subsection (a) (1) or subsection (a) 8(2) of this Section is a Class X felony. A violation of 9subsection (a) (3), (a) (4), (a) (5), (a) (6), (a) (7), or (a) 10(8) of this Section is a Class X felony for which the sentence 11shall be a term of imprisonment of no less than 12 years and no 12more than 50 years. 13    (c) For the purpose of this Section:14        "Emergency medical services personnel" has the meaning 15    specified in Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services 16    (EMS) Systems Act and shall include all ambulance crew 17    members, including drivers or pilots.18        "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in clause 19    (i) of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of 20    this Code. 21    (d) This Section does not apply to a peace officer while 22serving as a member of a tactical response team or special 23operations team. A peace officer may not personally own or 24apply for ownership of a device or attachment of any kind 25designed, used, or intended for use in silencing the report of 26any firearm. These devices shall be owned and maintained by   SB0297- 17 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1lawfully recognized units of government whose duties include 2the investigation of criminal acts. 3(Source: P.A. 99-816, eff. 8-15-16.) 4    (720 ILCS 5/24-2)5    Sec. 24-2. Exemptions. 6    (a) Subsections 24-1(a)(3), 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(10), and 724-1(a)(13) and Section 24-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of 8the following:9        (1) Peace officers, and any person summoned by a peace 10    officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the 11    peace, while actually engaged in assisting such officer.12        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 13    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 14    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense, 15    while in the performance of their official duty, or while 16    commuting between their homes and places of employment.17        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 18    the United States or the Illinois National Guard or the 19    Reserve Officers Training Corps, while in the performance 20    of their official duty.21        (4) Special agents employed by a railroad or a public 22    utility to perform police functions, and guards of armored 23    car companies, while actually engaged in the performance 24    of the duties of their employment or commuting between 25    their homes and places of employment; and watchmen while   SB0297- 18 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    actually engaged in the performance of the duties of their 2    employment.3        (5) Persons licensed as private security contractors, 4    private detectives, or private alarm contractors, or 5    employed by a private security contractor, private 6    detective, or private alarm contractor agency licensed by 7    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 8    if their duties include the carrying of a weapon under the 9    provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 10    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 11    2004, while actually engaged in the performance of the 12    duties of their employment or commuting between their 13    homes and places of employment. A person shall be 14    considered eligible for this exemption if he or she has 15    completed the required 20 hours of training for a private 16    security contractor, private detective, or private alarm 17    contractor, or employee of a licensed private security 18    contractor, private detective, or private alarm contractor 19    agency and 28 hours of required firearm training, and has 20    been issued a firearm control card by the Department of 21    Financial and Professional Regulation. Conditions for the 22    renewal of firearm control cards issued under the 23    provisions of this Section shall be the same as for those 24    cards issued under the provisions of the Private 25    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 26    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control   SB0297- 19 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    card shall be carried by the private security contractor, 2    private detective, or private alarm contractor, or 3    employee of the licensed private security contractor, 4    private detective, or private alarm contractor agency at 5    all times when he or she is in possession of a concealable 6    weapon permitted by his or her firearm control card.7        (6) Any person regularly employed in a commercial or 8    industrial operation as a security guard for the 9    protection of persons employed and private property 10    related to such commercial or industrial operation, while 11    actually engaged in the performance of his or her duty or 12    traveling between sites or properties belonging to the 13    employer, and who, as a security guard, is a member of a 14    security force registered with the Department of Financial 15    and Professional Regulation; provided that such security 16    guard has successfully completed a course of study, 17    approved by and supervised by the Department of Financial 18    and Professional Regulation, consisting of not less than 19    48 hours of training that includes the theory of law 20    enforcement, liability for acts, and the handling of 21    weapons. A person shall be considered eligible for this 22    exemption if he or she has completed the required 20 hours 23    of training for a security officer and 28 hours of 24    required firearm training, and has been issued a firearm 25    control card by the Department of Financial and 26    Professional Regulation. Conditions for the renewal of   SB0297- 20 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    firearm control cards issued under the provisions of this 2    Section shall be the same as for those cards issued under 3    the provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 4    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 5    2004. The firearm control card shall be carried by the 6    security guard at all times when he or she is in possession 7    of a concealable weapon permitted by his or her firearm 8    control card.9        (7) Agents and investigators of the Illinois 10    Legislative Investigating Commission authorized by the 11    Commission to carry the weapons specified in subsections 12    24-1(a)(3) and 24-1(a)(4), while on duty in the course of 13    any investigation for the Commission.14        (8) Persons employed by a financial institution as a 15    security guard for the protection of other employees and 16    property related to such financial institution, while 17    actually engaged in the performance of their duties, 18    commuting between their homes and places of employment, or 19    traveling between sites or properties owned or operated by 20    such financial institution, and who, as a security guard, 21    is a member of a security force registered with the 22    Department; provided that any person so employed has 23    successfully completed a course of study, approved by and 24    supervised by the Department of Financial and Professional 25    Regulation, consisting of not less than 48 hours of 26    training which includes theory of law enforcement,   SB0297- 21 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    liability for acts, and the handling of weapons. A person 2    shall be considered to be eligible for this exemption if 3    he or she has completed the required 20 hours of training 4    for a security officer and 28 hours of required firearm 5    training, and has been issued a firearm control card by 6    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 7    Conditions for renewal of firearm control cards issued 8    under the provisions of this Section shall be the same as 9    for those issued under the provisions of the Private 10    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 11    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 12    card shall be carried by the security guard at all times 13    when he or she is in possession of a concealable weapon 14    permitted by his or her firearm control card. For purposes 15    of this subsection, "financial institution" means a bank, 16    savings and loan association, credit union, or company 17    providing armored car services.18        (9) Any person employed by an armored car company to 19    drive an armored car, while actually engaged in the 20    performance of his duties.21        (10) Persons who have been classified as peace 22    officers pursuant to the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 23    Act.24        (11) Investigators of the Office of the State's 25    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor authorized by the board of 26    governors of the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate   SB0297- 22 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    Prosecutor to carry weapons pursuant to Section 7.06 of 2    the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.3        (12) Special investigators appointed by a State's 4    Attorney under Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code.5        (12.5) Probation officers while in the performance of 6    their duties, or while commuting between their homes, 7    places of employment or specific locations that are part 8    of their assigned duties, with the consent of the chief 9    judge of the circuit for which they are employed, if they 10    have received weapons training according to requirements 11    of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm 12    Training Act.13        (13) Court security officers Security Officers while 14    in the performance of their official duties, or while 15    commuting between their homes and places of employment, 16    with the consent of the sheriff Sheriff.17        (13.5) A person employed as an armed security guard at 18    a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or 19    facility regulated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 20    who has completed the background screening and training 21    mandated by the rules and regulations of the Nuclear 22    Regulatory Commission.23        (14) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of weapons 24    to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 25    (13.5) of this subsection to possess those weapons.26    (a-5) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply   SB0297- 23 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1to or affect any person carrying a concealed pistol, revolver, 2or handgun and the person has been issued a currently valid 3license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act at the time of 4the commission of the offense.5    (a-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 6to or affect a qualified current or retired law enforcement 7officer or a current or retired deputy, county correctional 8officer, or correctional officer of the Department of 9Corrections qualified under the laws of this State or under 10the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act. 11    (b) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 1224-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of the following:13        (1) Members of any club or organization organized for 14    the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon 15    established target ranges, whether public or private, and 16    patrons of such ranges, while such members or patrons are 17    using their firearms on those target ranges.18        (2) Duly authorized military or civil organizations 19    while parading, with the special permission of the 20    Governor.21        (3) Hunters, trappers, or fishermen while engaged in 22    lawful hunting, trapping, or fishing under the provisions 23    of the Wildlife Code or the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.24        (4) Transportation of weapons that are broken down in 25    a non-functioning state or are not immediately accessible.26        (5) Carrying or possessing any pistol, revolver, stun   SB0297- 24 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    gun or taser or other firearm on the land or in the legal 2    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 3    person's permission. 4    (c) Subsection 24-1(a)(7) does not apply to or affect any 5of the following:6        (1) Peace officers while in performance of their 7    official duties.8        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 9    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 10    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.11        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 12    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 13    the performance of their official duty.14        (4) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of machine 15    guns to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 16    (3) of this subsection to possess machine guns, if the 17    machine guns are broken down in a non-functioning state or 18    are not immediately accessible.19        (5) Persons licensed under federal law to manufacture 20    any weapon from which 8 or more shots or bullets can be 21    discharged by a single function of the firing device, or 22    ammunition for such weapons, and actually engaged in the 23    business of manufacturing such weapons or ammunition, but 24    only with respect to activities which are within the 25    lawful scope of such business, such as the manufacture, 26    transportation, or testing of such weapons or ammunition.   SB0297- 25 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    This exemption does not authorize the general private 2    possession of any weapon from which 8 or more shots or 3    bullets can be discharged by a single function of the 4    firing device, but only such possession and activities as 5    are within the lawful scope of a licensed manufacturing 6    business described in this paragraph.7        During transportation, such weapons shall be broken 8    down in a non-functioning state or not immediately 9    accessible.10        (6) The manufacture, transport, testing, delivery, 11    transfer, or sale, and all lawful commercial or 12    experimental activities necessary thereto, of rifles, 13    shotguns, and weapons made from rifles or shotguns, or 14    ammunition for such rifles, shotguns, or weapons, where 15    engaged in by a person operating as a contractor or 16    subcontractor pursuant to a contract or subcontract for 17    the development and supply of such rifles, shotguns, 18    weapons, or ammunition to the United States government or 19    any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, when 20    such activities are necessary and incident to fulfilling 21    the terms of such contract.22        The exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(6) 23    shall also apply to any authorized agent of any such 24    contractor or subcontractor who is operating within the 25    scope of his employment, where such activities involving 26    such weapon, weapons, or ammunition are necessary and   SB0297- 26 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    incident to fulfilling the terms of such contract.2        (7) A person possessing a rifle with a barrel or 3    barrels less than 16 inches in length if: (A) the person 4    has been issued a Curios and Relics license from the U.S. 5    Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or 6    (B) the person is an active member of a bona fide, 7    nationally recognized military re-enacting group and the 8    modification is required and necessary to accurately 9    portray the weapon for historical re-enactment purposes; 10    the re-enactor is in possession of a valid and current 11    re-enacting group membership credential; and the overall 12    length of the weapon as modified is not less than 26 13    inches.14    (d) Subsection 24-1(a)(1) does not apply to the purchase, 15possession or carrying of a black-jack or slung-shot by a 16peace officer.17    (e) Subsection 24-1(a)(8) does not apply to any owner, 18manager, or authorized employee of any place specified in that 19subsection nor to any law enforcement officer.20    (f) Subsection 24-1(a)(4) and subsection 24-1(a)(10) and 21Section 24-1.6 do not apply to members of any club or 22organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting 23at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or 24private, while using their firearms on those target ranges.25    (g) Subsections 24-1(a)(11) and 24-3.1(a)(6) do not apply 26to:  SB0297- 27 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        (1) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 2    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 3    the performance of their official duty.4        (2) Bonafide collectors of antique or surplus military 5    ordnance.6        (3) Laboratories having a department of forensic 7    ballistics, or specializing in the development of 8    ammunition or explosive ordnance.9        (4) Commerce, preparation, assembly, or possession of 10    explosive bullets by manufacturers of ammunition licensed 11    by the federal government, in connection with the supply 12    of those organizations and persons exempted by subdivision 13    (g)(1) of this Section, or like organizations and persons 14    outside this State, or the transportation of explosive 15    bullets to any organization or person exempted in this 16    Section by a common carrier or by a vehicle owned or leased 17    by an exempted manufacturer.18    (g-5) (Blank). Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to or 19affect persons licensed under federal law to manufacture any 20device or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended 21for use in silencing the report of any firearm, firearms, or 22ammunition for those firearms equipped with those devices, and 23actually engaged in the business of manufacturing those 24devices, firearms, or ammunition, but only with respect to 25activities that are within the lawful scope of that business, 26such as the manufacture, transportation, or testing of those   SB0297- 28 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1devices, firearms, or ammunition. This exemption does not 2authorize the general private possession of any device or 3attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 4silencing the report of any firearm, but only such possession 5and activities as are within the lawful scope of a licensed 6manufacturing business described in this subsection (g-5). 7During transportation, these devices shall be detached from 8any weapon or not immediately accessible.9    (g-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 1024-1.6 do not apply to or affect any parole agent or parole 11supervisor who meets the qualifications and conditions 12prescribed in Section 3-14-1.5 of the Unified Code of 13Corrections. 14    (g-7) (Blank). Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to a 15peace officer while serving as a member of a tactical response 16team or special operations team. A peace officer may not 17personally own or apply for ownership of a device or 18attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 19silencing the report of any firearm. These devices shall be 20owned and maintained by lawfully recognized units of 21government whose duties include the investigation of criminal 22acts.23    (g-10) (Blank). 24    (h) An information or indictment based upon a violation of 25any subsection of this Article need not negate negative any 26exemptions contained in this Article. The defendant shall have   SB0297- 29 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1the burden of proving such an exemption.2    (i) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 3affect the transportation, carrying, or possession, of any 4pistol or revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm 5consigned to a common carrier operating under license of the 6State of Illinois or the federal government, where such 7transportation, carrying, or possession is incident to the 8lawful transportation in which such common carrier is engaged; 9and nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 10affect the transportation, carrying, or possession of any 11pistol, revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm, not the 12subject of and regulated by subsection 24-1(a)(7) or 13subsection 24-2(c) of this Article, which is unloaded and 14enclosed in a case, firearm carrying box, shipping box, or 15other container, by the possessor of a valid Firearm Owners 16Identification Card.17(Source: P.A. 102-152, eff. 1-1-22; 102-779, eff. 1-1-23; 18102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 197-22-24.) 20    (720 ILCS 5/36-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 36-1)21    Sec. 36-1. Property subject to forfeiture. 22    (a) Any vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is 23subject to forfeiture under this Article if the vessel or 24watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is used with the knowledge 25and consent of the owner in the commission of or in the attempt   SB0297- 30 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1to commit as defined in Section 8-4 of this Code: 2        (1) an offense prohibited by Section 9-1 (first degree 3    murder), Section 9-3 (involuntary manslaughter and 4    reckless homicide), Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnaping), 5    Section 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.30 6    (aggravated criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.40 7    (predatory criminal sexual assault of a child), subsection 8    (a) of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse), subsection 9    (a), (c), or (d) of Section 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 10    sexual abuse), Section 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a 11    child), Section 11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution 12    except for keeping a place of juvenile prostitution), 13    Section 11-20.1 (child pornography), paragraph (a)(1), 14    (a)(2), (a)(4), (b)(1), (b)(2), (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), 15    (e)(4), (e)(5), (e)(6), or (e)(7) of Section 12-3.05 16    (aggravated battery), Section 12-7.3 (stalking), Section 17    12-7.4 (aggravated stalking), Section 16-1 (theft if the 18    theft is of precious metal or of scrap metal), subdivision 19    (f)(2) or (f)(3) of Section 16-25 (retail theft), Section 20    18-2 (armed robbery), Section 19-1 (burglary), Section 21    19-2 (possession of burglary tools), Section 19-3 22    (residential burglary), Section 20-1 (arson; residential 23    arson; place of worship arson), Section 20-2 (possession 24    of explosives or explosive or incendiary devices), 25    subdivision (a)(6) or (a)(7) of Section 24-1 (unlawful 26    possession of weapons), Section 24-1.2 (aggravated   SB0297- 31 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    discharge of a firearm), Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated 2    discharge of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a 3    device designed or used for silencing the report of a 4    firearm), Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 5    firearm), Section 28-1 (gambling), or Section 29D-15.2 6    (possession of a deadly substance) of this Code;7        (2) an offense prohibited by Section 21, 22, 23, 24 or 8    26 of the Cigarette Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft, 9    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 10    cigarettes;11        (3) an offense prohibited by Section 28, 29, or 30 of 12    the Cigarette Use Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft, 13    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 14    cigarettes;15        (4) an offense prohibited by Section 44 of the 16    Environmental Protection Act;17        (5) an offense prohibited by Section 11-204.1 of the 18    Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated fleeing or attempting to 19    elude a peace officer);20        (6) an offense prohibited by Section 11-501 of the 21    Illinois Vehicle Code (driving while under the influence 22    of alcohol or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound 23    or compounds or any combination thereof) or a similar 24    provision of a local ordinance, and:25            (A) during a period in which his or her driving 26        privileges are revoked or suspended if the revocation   SB0297- 32 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        or suspension was for:2                (i) Section 11-501 (driving under the 3            influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 4            intoxicating compound or compounds or any 5            combination thereof), 6                (ii) Section 11-501.1 (statutory summary 7            suspension or revocation),8                (iii) paragraph (b) of Section 11-401 (motor 9            vehicle crashes involving death or personal 10            injuries), or11                (iv) reckless homicide as defined in Section 12            9-3 of this Code;13            (B) has been previously convicted of reckless 14        homicide or a similar provision of a law of another 15        state relating to reckless homicide in which the 16        person was determined to have been under the influence 17        of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 18        compound or compounds as an element of the offense or 19        the person has previously been convicted of committing 20        a violation of driving under the influence of alcohol 21        or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 22        compounds or any combination thereof and was involved 23        in a motor vehicle crash that resulted in death, great 24        bodily harm, or permanent disability or disfigurement 25        to another, when the violation was a proximate cause 26        of the death or injuries;  SB0297- 33 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1            (C) the person committed a violation of driving 2        under the influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 3        intoxicating compound or compounds or any combination 4        thereof under Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle 5        Code or a similar provision for the third or 6        subsequent time;7            (D) he or she did not possess a valid driver's 8        license or permit or a valid restricted driving permit 9        or a valid judicial driving permit or a valid 10        monitoring device driving permit; or11            (E) he or she knew or should have known that the 12        vehicle he or she was driving was not covered by a 13        liability insurance policy;14        (7) an offense described in subsection (g) of Section 15    6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;16        (8) an offense described in subsection (e) of Section 17    6-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; or18        (9)(A) operating a watercraft under the influence of 19    alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 20    compounds, or combination thereof under Section 5-16 of 21    the Boat Registration and Safety Act during a period in 22    which his or her privileges to operate a watercraft are 23    revoked or suspended and the revocation or suspension was 24    for operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 25    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 26    or combination thereof; (B) operating a watercraft under   SB0297- 34 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 2    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 3    and has been previously convicted of reckless homicide or 4    a similar provision of a law in another state relating to 5    reckless homicide in which the person was determined to 6    have been under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 7    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination 8    thereof as an element of the offense or the person has 9    previously been convicted of committing a violation of 10    operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 11    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 12    or combination thereof and was involved in an accident 13    that resulted in death, great bodily harm, or permanent 14    disability or disfigurement to another, when the violation 15    was a proximate cause of the death or injuries; or (C) the 16    person committed a violation of operating a watercraft 17    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 18    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 19    under Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and Safety Act 20    or a similar provision for the third or subsequent time.21    (b) In addition, any mobile or portable equipment used in 22the commission of an act which is in violation of Section 7g of 23the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act shall be 24subject to seizure and forfeiture under the same procedures 25provided in this Article for the seizure and forfeiture of 26vessels or watercraft, vehicles, and aircraft, and any such   SB0297- 35 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1equipment shall be deemed a vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or 2aircraft for purposes of this Article.3    (c) In addition, when a person discharges a firearm at 4another individual from a vehicle with the knowledge and 5consent of the owner of the vehicle and with the intent to 6cause death or great bodily harm to that individual and as a 7result causes death or great bodily harm to that individual, 8the vehicle shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture under 9the same procedures provided in this Article for the seizure 10and forfeiture of vehicles used in violations of clauses (1), 11(2), (3), or (4) of subsection (a) of this Section.12    (d) If the spouse of the owner of a vehicle seized for an 13offense described in subsection (g) of Section 6-303 of the 14Illinois Vehicle Code, a violation of subdivision (d)(1)(A), 15(d)(1)(D), (d)(1)(G), (d)(1)(H), or (d)(1)(I) of Section 1611-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or Section 9-3 of this 17Code makes a showing that the seized vehicle is the only source 18of transportation and it is determined that the financial 19hardship to the family as a result of the seizure outweighs the 20benefit to the State from the seizure, the vehicle may be 21forfeited to the spouse or family member and the title to the 22vehicle shall be transferred to the spouse or family member 23who is properly licensed and who requires the use of the 24vehicle for employment or family transportation purposes. A 25written declaration of forfeiture of a vehicle under this 26Section shall be sufficient cause for the title to be   SB0297- 36 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1transferred to the spouse or family member. The provisions of 2this paragraph shall apply only to one forfeiture per vehicle. 3If the vehicle is the subject of a subsequent forfeiture 4proceeding by virtue of a subsequent conviction of either 5spouse or the family member, the spouse or family member to 6whom the vehicle was forfeited under the first forfeiture 7proceeding may not utilize the provisions of this paragraph in 8another forfeiture proceeding. If the owner of the vehicle 9seized owns more than one vehicle, the procedure set out in 10this paragraph may be used for only one vehicle.11    (e) In addition, property subject to forfeiture under 12Section 40 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 13Prevention Act may be seized and forfeited under this Article.14(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 16amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 17    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)18    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 19    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 20hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 21if:22        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 23    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 24    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of   SB0297- 37 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 2    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 3    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 4    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 5    or persons or the community, based on the specific 6    articulable facts of the case;7        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 8    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 9    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 10    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 11    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 12    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 13    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 14    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 15    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 16    of force against another person, residential burglary, 17    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 18    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 19    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 20    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 21    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 22    disability or disfigurement; 23        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 24    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 25    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 26    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense,   SB0297- 38 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 2    of the threat upon which the charge is based;3        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 4    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 5    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 6    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 7    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 8    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 9    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 10    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 11    or persons or the community, based on the specific 12    articulable facts of the case;13        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 14    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 15    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 16    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 17    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 18    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 19    case;20        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 21    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 22    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 23    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 24    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 25    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 26    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or   SB0297- 39 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 2    the case; 3        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 4    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 5    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 6    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 7    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 8    of the case:9            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 10        firearm);11            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge 12        of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 13        designed or use for silencing the report of a 14        firearm);15            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 16        firearm);17            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 18        firearm by a repeat felony offender);19            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 20        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 21        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 22        or flechette shells);23            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 24        firearms);25            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 26        firearms on the premises of any school);  SB0297- 40 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 2        liquor license);3            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 4        firearm);5            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);6            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);7            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);8            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 9        of a minor);10            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);11            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 12        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 13        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 14        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 15        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 16        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 17            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 18        manslaughter);19            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);20            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);21            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 22        endangerment);23            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 24            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 25        restraint); 26            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official);   SB0297- 41 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 2        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 3        discharge of a firearm); 4        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 5    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 6    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 7    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 8    the specific articulable facts of the case: 9            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 10        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 11        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);12            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 13        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 14        influence while operating a school bus with 15        passengers);16            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 17        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 18        influence causing great bodily harm);19            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 20        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 21        influence after a previous reckless homicide 22        conviction);23            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 24        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 25        influence leading to death); or26            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the   SB0297- 42 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 2        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 3        under the age of 16);4        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 5    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 6    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 7    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 8    persons or the community, based on the specific 9    articulable facts of the case; or 10        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 11    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:12            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 13        through (a)(7) of this Section; or14            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 15    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 16detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 17probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 18a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 19been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 20indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 21probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 22finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 23misdemeanor.24    (c) Timing of petition. 25        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 26    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or   SB0297- 43 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 2    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 3    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 4    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 5    previously released shall not be detained.6        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 7    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 8    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 9    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 10    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 11    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 12    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 13    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 14    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 15    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 16    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 17    filing of the petition and the hearing.18    (d) Contents of petition.19        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 20    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 21    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 22    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 23    persons or the community, based on the specific 24    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.25        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 26    petition under this Section, the State shall be required   SB0297- 44 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 2    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 3    filing of the previous petition.4    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 5for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 6proving by clear and convincing evidence that:7        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 8    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 9    subsection (a), and10        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 11    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 12    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 13    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 14    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 15    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 16    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 17    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 18    1986, and19        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 20    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 21    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 22    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 23    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 24    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 25    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 26    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and  SB0297- 45 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 2    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 3    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 4    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 5    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 6    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 7    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 8    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 9    appear in court as required.10    (f) Conduct of the hearings.11        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 12    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 13    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 14    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 15    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 16    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 17    hearing.18        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 19    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.20        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 21    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 22    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 23    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 24    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 25    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 26    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before   SB0297- 46 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 2    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 3    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 4    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 5    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 6    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 7    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 8    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 9        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 10    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 11    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 12    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 13    court determines that the physical health and safety of 14    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 15    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 16    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 17    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 18    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 19    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 20    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 21    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 22    Courts every 6 months. 23        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 24    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 25    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 26    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion   SB0297- 47 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 2    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 3    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 4    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 5    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 6    the court shall state on the record the reason for 7    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 8    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 9    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 10    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 11    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 12    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 13    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 14    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 15    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 16    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 17    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 18    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 19    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 20    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 21    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 22    criminal history, if available, and any written or 23    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 24    statements made by any person, if in the State's 25    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 26        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence   SB0297- 48 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 2    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 3    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 4    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 5    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 6    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 7    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 8    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.9        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 10    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 11    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 12    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 13    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 14    the defendant.15        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 16    release, and detention prior to trial must be 17    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 18    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 19    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 20    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 21dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 22defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 23person or persons or the community, based on the specific 24articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 25limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:26        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense   SB0297- 49 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 2    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.3        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 4    including:5            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 6        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 7        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 8        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 9        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 10        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.11            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 12        psychiatric or other similar social history which 13        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 14        nature, or lack of any such history.15        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 16    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 17    nature of the threat.18        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 19    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 20    them.21        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.22        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 23    complaining witness. 24        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 25    access to any weapon or weapons.26        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any   SB0297- 50 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 2    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 3    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 4    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 5    federal or State state law.6        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 7    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 8    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 9    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 10    or lack of such behavior.11    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 12detention:13        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 14    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 15    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 16    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 17    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 18    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 19    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;20        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 21    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 22    pending trial;23        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 24    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 25    communication with others of his or her choice by 26    visitation, mail and telephone; and  SB0297- 51 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 2    required for appearances in connection with court 3    proceedings.4    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 5detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 6Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 7offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 8on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 9is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 10the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 11release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 12any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 13the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 14from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 15good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.16    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 17before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 18is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 19of any person or persons or the community, based on the 20specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 21defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 22    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 23entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 24denying his or her pretrial release.25    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 26this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial   SB0297- 52 -LRB104 03935 RLC 13959 b1release.2    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 3shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 4defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 5proceedings.6    (m) Interest of victims. 7        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 8    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 9    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 10    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 11    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 12        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 13    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 14    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 15    defendant remains in custody. 16(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 17revised 10-23-24.)